dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
addetmek/≜
affetmek/≜
ahdetmek/≜
ahzetmek/≜
akdetmek/≜
aksetmek/≜
atfetmek/≜
azletmek/≜
azmetmek/≜
bahsetmek/≜
bahşetmek/≜
cebretmek/≜
cehdetmek/≜
celbetmek/≜
cemetmek/≜
cezbetmek/≜
dahletmek/≜
darbetmek/≜
defetmek/≜
defnetmek/≜
devretmek/≜
ditmek/≜
emretmek/≜
etmek/≜
fasletmek/≜
feshetmek/≜
fethetmek/≜
gadretmek/≜
gasbetmek/≜
gasletmek/≜
gaspetmek/≜
gitmek/≜
gusletmek/≜
haccetmek/≜
haczetmek/≜
hakketmek/≜
haletmek/≜
halletmek/≜
hamdetmek/≜
hamletmek/≜
hapsetmek/≜
haptetmek/≜
hasretmek/≜
hatmetmek/≜
hazfetmek/≜
hazmetmek/≜
hazzetmek/≜
hicvetmek/≜
hissetmek/≜
hükmetmek/≜
hıfzetmek/≜
kahretmek/≜
kastetmek/≜
katetmek/≜
katletmek/≜
kaybetmek/≜
kaydetmek/≜
kesbetmek/≜
keyfetmek/≜
keşfetmek/≜
küfretmek/≜
lağvetmek/≜
leffetmek/≜
lütfetmek/≜
mahvetmek/≜
massetmek/≜
menetmek/≜
meshetmek/≜
methetmek/≜
meyletmek/≜
mezcetmek/≜
nakletmek/≜
nakzetmek/≜
nakşetmek/≜
nasbetmek/≜
nefyetmek/≜
nezetmek/≜
nezretmek/≜
neşretmek/≜
nüksetmek/≜
raksetmek/≜
raptetmek/≜
recmetmek/≜
reddetmek/≜
rekzetmek/≜
resmetmek/≜
sabretmek/≜
serdetmek/≜
setretmek/≜
seyretmek/≜
süregitmek/≜
sırretmek/≜
tabetmek/≜
tayyetmek/≜
vadetmek/≜
vakfetmek/≜
vazetmek/≜
vehmetmek/≜
zammetmek/≜
zannetmek/≜
zehretmek/≜
zemmetmek/≜
zikretmek/≜
zulmetmek/≜
şakketmek/≜
şükretmek/≜
